cs: Zdraví a krása > Čištění a péče o šperky > Nástroje na čištění šperků: Kartáčky na čištění šperků; Utěrky na leštění šperků; Ultrazvukové čističky šperků
es: Salud y belleza > Limpieza y cuidado de joyas > Artículos para la limpieza de joyas: Cepillos de limpieza de joyas; Paños para pulir joyas; Limpiadores ultrasónicos de joyería
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Czyszczenie i pielęgnacja biżuterii > Narzędzia do czyszczenia biżuterii: Szczoteczki do czyszczenia biżuterii; Ściereczki do polerowania biżuterii; Ultradźwiękowe myjki do biżuterii
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Juvelyrinių dirbinių valymas ir priežiūra > Juvelyrinių dirbinių valymo įrankiai: Juvelyrinių dirbinių valymo šepetėliai; Juvelyrinių dirbinių poliravimo šluostės; Ultragarsiniai juvelyrinių dirbinių valymo įrenginiai
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Vệ sinh và bảo quản trang sức > Dụng cụ làm sạch trang sức: Bàn chải làm sạch trang sức; Vải đánh bóng trang sức; Thiết bị làm sạch trang sức bằng sóng siêu âm
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Καθαρισμός & περιποίηση κοσμημάτων > Εργαλεία καθαρισμού κοσμημάτων: Βούρτσες καθαρισμού κοσμημάτων; Πανιά στίλβωσης κοσμημάτων; Καθαριστικά κοσμημάτων με υπερήχους
hu: Egészség és szépség > Ékszertisztítás és -ápolás > Ékszertisztító eszközök: Ékszertisztító kefék; Ékszerpolírozó kendők; Ultrahangos ékszertisztítók
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Smyckesvård och smyckesrengöring > Verktyg för smyckesrengöring: Borstar för smyckesrengöring; Putsdukar till smycken; Smyckerengörare med ultraljud
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Limpeza e cuidado de joalharia > Ferramentas de limpeza de joalharia: Escovas de limpeza de joalharia; Panos de polimento de joalharia; Limpadores ultrassónicos de joias
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Limpeza e cuidado de jóias > Ferramentas para limpeza de joias: Escovas para limpeza de joias; Panos de polimento de joias; Limpadores ultrassônicos de joias
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Rengjøring og pleie av smykker > Rengjøringsverkøy for smykker: Rengjøringsbørster for smykker; Poleringskluter for smykker; Smykkerensere med ultralyd
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Čiščenje in nega nakita > Orodja za čiščenje nakita: Ščetke za čiščenje nakita; Krpice za loščenje nakita; Ultrazvočni čistilniki nakita
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Korujen puhdistus ja huolto > Korujen puhdistusvälineet: Korujen puhdistusharjat; Korujen puhdistusliinat; Korujen ultraäänipuhdistuslaitteet
fr: Santé et beauté > Entretien et nettoyage des bijoux > Outils de nettoyage pour bijoux: Brosses de nettoyage pour bijoux; Chiffons de polissage pour bijoux; Nettoyeurs de bijoux à ultrasons
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 首飾清潔保養 > 珠寶清洗用具: 珠寶清潔刷; 珠寶擦拭布; 超音波珠寶清洗機
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลและทำความสะอาดเครื่องเพชรพลอย > เครื่องมือทำความสะอาดเครื่องเพชรพลอย: แปรงทำความสะอาดเครื่องเพชรพลอย; ผ้าขัดเครื่องเพชรพลอย; เครื่องทำความสะอาดเครื่องเพชรพลอยแบบอัลตราโซนิก
ru: Красота и здоровье > Уход за ювелирными изделиями > Инструменты для чистки ювелирных изделий: Щетки для чистки ювелирных изделий; Салфетки для полировки ювелирных изделий; Ультразвуковые очистители для ювелирных изделий
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Čišćenje i njega nakita > Alati za čišćenje i njegu nakita: Kistovi za čišćenje i njegu nakita; Krpe za poliranje nakita; Ultrazvučni čistači nakita
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Čistenie a starostlivosť o šperky > Nástroje na čistenie šperkov: Kefky na čistenie šperkov; Utierky na leštenie šperkov; Ultrazvukové čističe šperkov
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 珠宝首饰清洗与护理 > 珠宝首饰清洁工具: 珠宝清洁刷; 珠宝抛光布; 超声波珠宝清洁器
it: Salute e bellezza > Pulizia e cura dei gioielli > Strumenti per la pulizia di gioielli: Spazzole per la pulizia dei gioielli; Panni per lucidare gioielli; Detergenti per gioielli ad ultrasuoni
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Curățarea și îngrijirea bijuteriilor > Instrumente pentru curățarea bijuteriilor: Perii pentru curățarea bijuteriilor; Lavete pentru lustruit bijuterii; Dispozitive de curățat bijuterii cu ultrasunete
ja: 美容・健康 > ジュエリーお手入れ用品 > ジュエリー洗浄用品: ジュエリー洗浄ブラシ; ジュエリー磨きクロス; 超音波ジュエリークリーナー
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Schmuckreinigung & -pflege > Hilfsmittel zur Schmuckreinigung: Bürsten zur Schmuckreinigung; Poliertücher für Schmuck; Ultraschall-Schmuckreiniger
ko: 건강/미용 > 주얼리 세척/관리 > 주얼리 세척 도구: 주얼리 세척 브러시; 주얼리 광택용 천; 초음파 주얼리 세척기
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Почистване и грижа за бижута > Инструменти за почистване на бижута: Четки за почистване на бижута; Кърпи за полиране на бижута; Ултразвукови вани за почистване на бижута
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Smykkerens og pleje > Værktøj til rensning af smykker: Børster til rensning af smykker; Pudseklude til smykker; Ultralydssmykkerensere
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Reiniging en onderhoud van sieraden > Reinigers voor sieraden: Reinigingsborstels voor sieraden; Reinigingsdoeken voor sieraden; Ultrasone reinigers voor sieraden
en: Health & Beauty > Jewelry Cleaning & Care > Jewelry Cleaning Tools: Jewelry Cleaning Brushes; Jewelry Polishing Cloths; Ultrasonic Jewelry Cleaners
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Mücevher Temizlik ve Bakımı > Mücevher Temizleme Araçları: Mücevher Temizleme Fırçaları; Mücevher Parlatma Bezleri; Ultrasonik Mücevher Temizleyicileri